South Dakota, session 2026, SB181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That chapter 34-20G be REPEALED.
Section 2. Section 1 of this Act is effective ninety days after the attorney general notifies the
code counsel and the Department of Health that cannabis has been reclassified as a schedule
III drug by the United States Food and Drug Administration, pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 812 (July
16, 2025).
Section 3. After receiving notification by the attorney general, as provided for in section 2 of
this Act, the Department of Health shall notify all cardholders and medical cannabis
establishments of the re-scheduling and of the date on which the repeal of the medical
cannabis chapter is effective.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.